District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.03

Repealed

Authorized purposes for organization of corporation.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 180, ch. 269, § 3
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 137, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(5)
Oct. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-117, § 2, 25 DCR 1509
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378 § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.03.
1981 Ed., § 29-303.
1973 Ed., § 29-903.